Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4791.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9135. (1) The department, in consultation with qualified organizations, shall develop or adopt and implement a menopause transition awareness education program. The education program must include information on all of the following: (a) The symptoms and trajectories of change from menopausal transition to post-menopause transition. (b) Chronic conditions related to menopause. (c) The range of treatment options that may be prescribed by a health professional for symptoms, changes, and conditions, and available tools to screen individuals for menopause. (d) Any other information that the department considers necessary or appropriate to educate the public and health professionals on menopause and chronic conditions related to menopause. (2) The department shall disseminate the information described in this section and promote the educational program to health professionals and the public. The department may post the information on the department's website. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Educational program" means the menopause transition awareness education program developed or adopted under subsection (1). (b) "Qualified organizations" means the Michigan board of medicine created in part 170, the Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery created in part 175, and organizations that promote the health of women during menopause.